Florida, session 2026, SB354.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 89 90 Section 1.âSection 163.3249, Florida Statutes, is created 91 to read: 92 163.3249âBlue ribbon projects.â 93 (1)âPURPOSE AND INTENT.âThe purpose of this section is to 94 ensure the appropriate use of important state resources and 95 facilities. It is the intent of the Legislature to accomplish 96 this goal by incentivizing large landowners in this state to be 97 good stewards of the natural environment while at the same time 98 promoting a more sustainable pattern of development. The 99 Legislature intends to create blue ribbon projects, and to 100 provide a mechanism by which local governments shall implement 101 those projects within their boundaries, in order to promote the 102 goals of preserving natural areas, encouraging agricultural land 103 uses and rural land stewardship, protecting critical ecological 104 systems, expanding wildlife corridors, and providing more 105 compact mixed-use developments designed for long-term viability. 106 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 107 (a)ââApplicantâ means the owner of land on which a blue 108 ribbon project is proposed. 109 (b)ââBlue ribbon planâ or âplanâ means the plan required by 110 subsection (5). 111 (c)ââBlue ribbon projectâ or âprojectâ means a project that 112 meets the requirements of subsection (3). 113 (d)ââDevelopment areaâ means land that may be developed 114 with residential, commercial, industrial, or other uses. 115 (e)ââMissing middle housingâ means a range of for-sale and 116 for-rent housing types, including, but not limited to, duplexes, 117 triplexes, townhomes, small multifamily buildings, and small 118 detached single-family homes, that fill the gap between larger 119 single-family homes and larger apartment buildings. Such housing 120 may be vertically and horizontally integrated. 121 (f)ââNew urban designâ means a development design that 122 creates walkable, mixed-use, human-centered places. 123 (g)ââReserve areaâ means land that is set aside for 124 environmental conservation, wildlife corridors, wetland and 125 wildlife mitigation, productive agriculture and silviculture, 126 uses consistent with the public purposes described under s. 127 570.71(1), parks, recreational activities, utility sites, 128 reservoirs and lakes, or other uses that support such 129 activities. Reserve areas may not include golf courses or data 130 centers. 131 (h)ââSpecial assessment districtâ means a community 132 development district, municipal services taxing district, 133 municipal services benefit district, or other district available 134 under state law that allows for the assessment of ad valorem or 135 non-ad valorem taxes on parcels of real property located within 136 a blue ribbon project for the purpose of constructing, 137 maintaining, repairing, and replacing capital improvements that 138 serve the blue ribbon project. The term does not include an 139 improvement district. 140 (3)âMINIMUM REQUIREMENTS.âA development project must meet 141 all of the following requirements to qualify as a blue ribbon 142 project: 143 (a)âThe project must contain a minimum of 10,000 acres of 144 land which are contiguous as defined in s. 163.3163(3)(a) and 145 which are owned by the same person or by entities owned or 146 controlled by the same person, and the majority of which are not 147 located within a municipality. 148 (b)âAt least 60 percent of the land contained in the 149 project must be reserve area. If any project boundary is 150 contiguous to state-owned environmental preservation land or the 151 Florida wildlife corridor, a portion of the projectâs reserve 152 area must be located adjacent to the state-owned land or the 153 Florida wildlife corridor, as applicable. 154 (c)âUp to 40 percent of the land contained in the project 155 may be development area. The development area must meet all of 156 the following requirements: 157 1.âIndividual development areas within the project must be 158 designed to enhance walkability and mobility and must include a 159 mix of land uses. 160 2.âAt least 15 percent of the development area must be 161 allocated to nonresidential land uses, which may include mixed 162 use buildings that contain ground floor nonresidential units. 163 Conservation easement areas may not be counted toward the 15 164 percent. 165 3.âA portion of the development area must be allocated to 166 uses intended to provide economic development and create high 167 wage jobs. The development area so allocated must be in a 168 location that is within 60 miles of an interstate interchange, 169 an active rail line, or a regional or international airport or 170 other transportation facility. 171 4.âThe development area must have a dense, walkable, mixed 172 use, human-centered development pattern that includes new urban 173 design, including, but not limited to, towns, villages, and 174 hamlets that have reserve area between them. 175 5.âTypes of residential units within the development area 176 must be varied and include single-family, multifamily, and 177 attached and detached residential units. 178 (4)âDEVELOPMENT AREA DENSITIES AND INTENSITIES.â 179 (a)âA maximum residential density of 12 units per gross 180 acre, and a maximum nonresidential intensity of 85 percent 181 impervious surface ratio per gross acre, is permitted within the 182 development area, as measured in combination throughout all 183 phases of the project. 184 (b)âAt least 20 percent of residential units within the 185 development area in each phase of the project must be a 186 combination of the following: 187 1.âAffordable housing, with initial sale prices and ongoing 188 rents at or below 80 percent of adjusted gross income, as 189 defined in s. 420.602, for the county in which the development 190 area is located. 191 2.âMissing middle housing. 192 3.âHousing for people eligible for the Florida Hometown 193 Hero Program under s. 420.5096. 194 (c)âThe development area may be developed in phases to 195 accommodate growth projections in the geographical area in which 196 the project is located. Development rights and mitigation of 197 project impacts shall be vested for at least 50 years. If the 198 applicant achieves development as defined in s. 380.04 of at 199 least 50 percent of the development area within 50 years after 200 the projectâs date of initial public dedication of 201 infrastructure, the vested period must be extended for an 202 additional 25 years. 203 (5)âBLUE RIBBON PLANS.âA blue ribbon project must have a 204 blue ribbon plan, which is the master development plan for the 205 project. Blue ribbon plans must include a document that 206 addresses the requirements of this section and exhibits, 207 including maps, illustrations, and text supported by data and 208 analysis, that demonstrate compliance therewith. The plan must 209 include all of the following: 210 (a)âA long-term master development map that, at a minimum, 211 generally depicts the locations of reserve area and development 212 area throughout the project area. 213 (b)âIdentification and analysis of necessary water supplies 214 and available sources of water, including water resource 215 development and water supply development projects, and water 216 conservation measures required to meet the projected demand from 217 each phase of the project. Water and wastewater facilities must 218 be provided in compliance with s. 163.3180. Such facilities may 219 be provided by the applicant; a local unit of special purpose 220 government or a special district, except an improvement 221 district; a local government; or the state. Local governments 222 are encouraged to enter into public-private partnerships to 223 accomplish water storage and other water quality and capacity 224 improvements within the boundaries of blue ribbon projects 225 pursuant to s. 373.4591. 226 (c)âIdentification and analysis of the transportation 227 facilities and future transportation corridors necessary to 228 serve development area land uses in the master development plan, 229 including guidelines to be used to establish each modal 230 component intended to optimize mobility. Transportation 231 facilities must be provided in compliance with s. 163.3180. Such 232 facilities must be provided by the applicant or a special 233 assessment district created at the request of the applicant. A 234 special assessment district, a local government, or the state 235 may enter into a public-private partnership with the applicant 236 pursuant to s. 255.065 to provide such facilities. Internal 237 roads must be designed in accordance with the Department of 238 Transportationâs traditional neighborhood development guidelines 239 provided in chapter 19 of the Manual of Uniform Minimum 240 Standards for Design, Construction and Maintenance for Streets 241 and Highways, 2023 edition. 242 (d)âIdentification of other regionally significant public 243 facilities necessary to support the projectâs permitted density 244 as provided in paragraph (4)(a) for each phase of the project, 245 which facilities must include utilities, parks, and schools, and 246 policies providing the procedures to mitigate the impacts of the 247 projectâs permitted density on public facilities. Public 248 facilities must be provided in compliance with s. 163.3180. Such 249 facilities must be provided by the applicant or a special 250 assessment district created at the request of the applicant. A 251 special assessment district, a local government, or the state 252 may enter into a public-private partnership with the applicant 253 pursuant to s. 255.065 to provide such facilities. 254 (e)âIdentification of regionally significant natural 255 resources within the reserve area based on the best available 256 data and policies, and provision of mechanisms to ensure the 257 perpetual protection or conservation of specific resources, 258 consistent with the overall conservation and development 259 strategy for the project area. The provision of regionally 260 significant natural resources within the reserve area is 261 determined to be a net ecosystem benefit. 262 (f)âGeneral principles and guidelines that do all of the 263 following: 264 1.âAddress the land uses within the development area and 265 reserve area, and the interrelationships between such areas. 266 2.âAddress the protection and, as appropriate, restoration 267 and management of reserve areas identified in the recorded blue 268 ribbon plan for permanent conservation and public use, which 269 must be phased in coordination with the phased development 270 within the development area as specified in the master 271 development plan. 272 3.âAchieve a cleaner, healthier environment. 273 4.âLimit urban sprawl. 274 5.âProvide a range of housing types. 275 6.âProtect wildlife and natural areas. 276 7.âAdvance the efficient use of land and other resources. 277 8.âCreate quality communities of a design that reduces and 278 captures vehicle trips and promotes mobility options. 279 9.âEnhance the prospects for state and local economic 280 development objectives and high-wage job creation. 281 (g)âDevelopment standards for each type of land use 282 proposed within the development area which is typically found in 283 a planned unit development as defined in s. 163.3202(5)(b) and 284 which is consistent with new urban design. 285 (h)âProvision for an easement granted without charge to the 286 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services under s. 570.71 287 for any portion of the reserve area which will be reserved for 288 uses consistent with the public purposes provided in s. 289 570.71(1). The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 290 and the landowner must enter into an agreement regarding 291 allowable uses for the easement interest before an easement is 292 granted. The plan must also include a covenant that any easement 293 or property granted to another state agency, a water management 294 district, or a local government will be granted without charge. 295 296 A blue ribbon plan must be based on a planning period longer 297 than the generally applicable planning period of the local 298 comprehensive plan and must specify the projected population 299 within the planning area during the chosen planning period. A 300 plan is not required to demonstrate need based on projected 301 population growth or any other basis. If under the plan a 302 project contributes land or funds or otherwise causes the 303 construction of public facilities pursuant to s. 163.3180, the 304 project must receive dollar-for-dollar credits against impact, 305 mobility, proportionate share, or other fee credits from the 306 local government for such facility improvements as required by 307 s. 163.3180. Impact fees must be calculated as applicable at the 308 time of issuance of building permits. 309 (6)âSTATE ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OF BLUE RIBBON PLANS.âIn 310 order to initiate approval of a blue ribbon plan, a landowner 311 shall apply first to the Department of Commerce for approval of 312 a blue ribbon project. The application must include a blue 313 ribbon plan that meets the requirements of subsection (5). The 314 departmentâs review of a project is limited to a review for 315 compliance with this section. The department shall provide 316 copies of the application to the Department of Agriculture and 317 Consumer Services, the Department of Environmental Protection, 318 the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, the Department of 319 Transportation, and the applicable water management district for 320 review and comment within each entityâs respective legal purview 321 on the planâs compliance with this section. Such entities shall 322 provide written comments to the Department of Commerce within 21 323 days after receipt of the application by the department. Within 324 45 days after receipt of the application, the department shall 325 approve the application or provide to the applicant a written 326 notice that identifies with specificity any areas of 327 noncompliance and includes the written comments received from 328 the specified entities. If the department fails to either 329 approve the application or provide such notice within 45 days 330 after receipt of the application, or fails to provide a written 331 approval or denial of the application within 20 days after the 332 applicant provides a response to the notice, the application is 333 automatically approved by the department. At any point after the 334 departmentâs initial 45-day review period, the applicant may 335 request a final determination of approval or denial by the 336 department, and the department must provide the determination 337 within 7 days after receipt of the request. If the department 338 fails to provide the determination within the 7-day period, the 339 application is automatically approved by the department. 340 (7)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW OF BLUE RIBBON 341 PLANS.â 342 (a)âA blue ribbon project may be located on land with any 343 future land use designation provided in the applicable local 344 governmentâs comprehensive plan and with any zoning designation 345 listed in the applicable local governmentâs land development 346 regulations. A local governmentâs approval of a project creates 347 an overlay special district within the local governmentâs 348 comprehensive plan which must adhere to the projectâs blue 349 ribbon plan. A local government may not require a comprehensive 350 plan amendment or rezoning for approval of a project. 351 (b)1.âUpon approval of a blue ribbon project by the 352 Department of Commerce, the landowner shall apply to the local 353 government for approval of the project. If the project is 354 located within more than one local governmentâs jurisdiction, 355 the landowner must apply to each applicable local government. In 356 reviewing the project, each applicable local government shall 357 apply subsections (3), (4), and (5) to the project as a whole. 358 2.âWithin 30 days after receipt of an application for 359 approval of a project, the local government shall conduct a duly 360 noticed public workshop at which the project is presented. The 361 applicant must be permitted to attend and participate in the 362 workshop. 363 3.âThe local government shall review the project within 15 364 days after receipt of the application. The review is limited to 365 a review for compliance with this section. A project that is in 366 compliance with this section must be administratively approved 367 without further action by the local government or any quasi 368 judicial or administrative reviewing body. A project approved by 369 the Department of Commerce is presumed to be in compliance with 370 this section. In order for a local government to overcome such 371 presumption, the local government must find that the blue ribbon 372 plan does not comply with subsection (5). If the local 373 government makes such a finding, the local government must 374 provide a written notice to the applicant which identifies with 375 specificity the area of noncompliance and provides the applicant 376 60 days to respond and submit any information necessary to 377 comply with subsection (5). If the local government fails to 378 provide such notice within 90 days after receipt of the 379 application, or fails to provide a written approval or denial of 380 the application within 30 days after the applicant provides a 381 response to such notice, the application is automatically 382 approved. At any point after the local governmentâs initial 90 383 day review period, the applicant may request a final 384 determination of approval or denial by the local government, and 385 the local government must provide the determination within 7 386 days after receipt of the request. If the local government fails 387 to provide the determination within the 7-day period, the 388 application is automatically approved. 389 (c)âApplicants may hire private companies to conduct plan 390 reviews and building inspections pursuant to s. 553.791. 391 (d)âIf a blue ribbon project is approved, the applicant 392 must publish notice of such approval in a newspaper of general 393 circulation in the area in which the land is located. The notice 394 must include the local government order number, if any; the 395 section, township, and range in which the land is located; and a 396 description of the project. The notice must be published within 397 14 days after the approval is issued. 398 (e)âAfter a blue ribbon project has been reviewed and 399 approved, the applicant must record the blue ribbon plan in the 400 public records of the county in which the project property is 401 located, and the plan shall run with title to the land. The 402 applicant may not amend the recorded plan without undergoing 403 local government review of the plan amendment in accordance with 404 paragraph (b). Local government review of a plan amendment is 405 limited to the portions of the plan which are being revised. 406 (8)âAPPEAL PROCEDURE.â 407 (a)1.âIf the Department of Commerce denies an application 408 for a blue ribbon project, the applicant may request an 409 administrative hearing pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57 within 410 21 days after the date on which the applicant receives the 411 departmentâs written denial. 412 2.âIf a local government denies an application for a blue 413 ribbon project, the applicant may appeal the decision by filing 414 a written petition with the Department of Commerce within 21 415 days after the date on which the applicant receives the local 416 governmentâs written denial. The applicant shall provide a copy 417 of the notice of appeal to the local government. 418 (b)âAny person whose substantial interests are or may be 419 affected by the local governmentâs approval of a blue ribbon 420 project may request an administrative hearing by filing a 421 written petition with the Department of Commerce pursuant to ss. 422 120.569 and 120.57. The petition must be filed with the 423 Department of Commerce within 21 days after newspaper 424 publication of the notice of the local government decision in 425 accordance with paragraph (7)(d). The petition must clearly 426 state the reasons for the petition and describe how the project 427 will adversely affect the person more substantially than the 428 general population of the geographic area in which the project 429 is located. A copy of the petition must also be provided to the 430 local government. If a petition is timely filed pursuant to this 431 paragraph, the applicant may intervene as a party to the 432 hearing. 433 (c)âBefore issuing an order on an appeal or petition under 434 this subsection, the Department of Commerce must hold a hearing 435 in accordance with chapter 120. 436 (d)âThe Department of Commerce shall determine whether the 437 blue ribbon project meets the requirements of this section and 438 issue a final order granting or denying the application. The 439 department may attach conditions and restrictions to the order. 440 The department may provide a determination in the final order 441 which is different from the determination it provided after 442 review of the application under subsection (6). 443 (e)âSection 120.595 applies to proceedings brought by a 444 person whose substantial interests are or may be affected by the 445 local governmentâs approval of a blue ribbon project under this 446 section. 447 (9)âA blue ribbon project must comply with applicable 448 provisions of chapters 373 and 403. 449 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.